Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Energy Park Authority

152A.501.
Definitions for KRS 152A.503 to 152A.543. [Repealed.]

152A.503.
Chemical/energy park authority — Membership — Powers — Compensation — Quorum — Chairman — Appointive employes. [Repealed.]

152A.505.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

152A.507.
Written agreements to finance or refinance projects. [Repealed.]

152A.509.
Agreements between authority and lessee. [Repealed.]

152A.511.
Issuance of revenue bonds. [Repealed.]

152A.513.
Bonds not a debt of Commonwealth. [Repealed.]

152A.515.
Bonds may be secured by a trust indenture between authority and corporate trustee — Contents of indenture. [Repealed.]

152A.517.
Enforcement of rights by bondholder or trustee. [Repealed.]

152A.519.
Status of bonds as investments.

Bonds issued by the authority are securities in which all public officers and public bodies, agencies, and instrumentalities of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the Commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.
Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 257, § 10, effective July 15, 1980.

152A.521.
Revenue refunding bonds. [Repealed.]

152A.523.
Proceeds of bonds and revenues are trust funds. [Repealed.]

152A.525.
Property held by authority and bonds issued by authority tax exempt. [Repealed.]

152A.527.
Purchases by authority. [Repealed.]

152A.529.
Maintenance of completed project by lessee. [Repealed.]

152A.531.
Disposal of project by authority. [Repealed.]

152A.533.
Damage to private property. [Repealed.]

152A.535.
Project studies by department. [Repealed.]

152A.537.
Annual report and audit. [Repealed.]

152A.539.
Prohibited activity. [Repealed.]

152A.541.
KRS 152A.503 to 152A.543 not in derogation of powers now existing. [Repealed.]

152A.543.
No bonds to be issued except on approval of capital projects and bond oversight committee, interim joint appropriations and revenue committee or standing appropriations and revenue committee. [Repealed.]

152A.545.
Nonseverability of provisions. [Repealed.]